test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-almos_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - a´lmos: # 2B
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Nom: a´lmos             
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Gen: almoos
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Acc: almoos
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Ill: almosân
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Loc: almosist
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Com: almosáin
    a´lmos+N+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    a´lmos+N+Ess: a´lmosin                
    a´lmos+N+Par: a´lmosid                
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Nom: almoseh
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Gen: almosij
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Acc: almosijd
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Ill: almosáid
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Loc: almosijn
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Com: almosijguin
    a´lmos+N+Pl+Abe: almosijttáá
